Vermont, session 2025-2026, H456.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 2 of 11
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Social determinants of health and crime are interconnected and
impact public health and safety.
(2) Housing conditions are a key determinant of both health and crime.
The lack of affordable housing contributes to the extended incarceration of
justice-involved individuals beyond their minimum sentences in Vermont and
is linked to higher recidivism rates. Incarceration itself worsens these
conditions, negatively affecting public health and safety.
(3) Access to health care is also a social determinant of health and
crime. Justice-involved individuals suffer from higher rates of chronic health
conditions, infectious diseases, substance use disorders, and mental illness. A
public health approach focused on prevention and addressing these shared
determinants is essential for improving health and reducing crime.
(4) Education is a critical social determinant of both health and crime.
(5) Economic and social opportunities also drive both health outcomes
and criminal behavior.
(6) Incarceration often exacerbates social and economic harm and fails
to effectively rehabilitate individuals.
(7) Vermont can reduce criminal behavior by investing in housing,
education, workforce development, health care, nutrition, and mental health
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 3 of 11
services, offering community-based support to justice-involved individuals
instead of relying on incarceration.
Sec. 2. INTENT AND PURPOSE
(a) Intent.
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to reduce harm, restore
justice, promote recovery, and build resilience by delaying the construction of
new correctional facilities and prioritizing investments in social and housing
infrastructure.
(2) It is further the intent of the General Assembly to promote
transformative justice and recovery by providing housing and shelter for
justice-involved individuals alongside community-based support services.
(b) Purpose. The purpose of this act is to transform Vermont’s criminal
justice system by reducing reliance on State-funded correctional facilities. The
act seeks to establish a community-based system of care and rehabilitation that
reduces recidivism and promotes recovery. The system will include:
(1) accessible, equitable, and localized services statewide;
(2) secure housing for individuals in recovery and those at risk of self-
harm or harming others;
(3) strengthened treatment, education, and workforce training integrated
into localized, equitable residential programs;
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 4 of 11
(4) pathways to economic security through fair compensation, financial
services, and opportunities for homeownership and small business
development; and
(5) support for healthy relationships to help individuals repair harm and
reconnect with family and community.
Sec. 3. APPROPRIATION; HUMAN SERVICES; JUSTICE-INVOLVED
INDIVIDUALS; HOMELESSNESS PREVENTION
(a) The sum of $1,313,044.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Agency of Human Services in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of issuing
grants to Pathways Vermont to deliver supportive and transitional housing to
individuals who are homeless or at risk of homelessness and who are being
released from incarceration or who were previously incarcerated.
(b) Any grant issued pursuant to this section shall be used to provide
supportive and transitional housing to individuals who are homeless or at risk
of homelessness and who are being released from incarceration or who were
previously incarcerated.
Sec. 4. APPROPRIATION; LAND ACCESS AND OPPORTUNITY
BOARD; JUSTICE-INVOLVED INDIVIDUALS; SUPPORTIVE
AND TRANSITIONAL HOUSING
(a) The sum of $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Land Access and Opportunity Board in fiscal year 2026 to issue grants to
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 5 of 11
community-based service providers for assistance with the purchase of real
property for the creation of supportive and transitional housing.
(b) The grants provided pursuant to this section shall be used by
community-based service providers to provide supportive and transitional
housing to justice-involved individuals who are experiencing homelessness or
at risk of homelessness.
(c) The Land Access and Opportunity Board shall issue grants pursuant to
this section to prioritize housing for groups who have been historically
disadvantaged, including individuals who are Black, Indigenous, or Persons of
Color; individuals with disabilities; individuals who are LGBTQ+; and
women.
(d) Any grant issued pursuant to this section shall also prioritize the use of
the Housing First model and the work of peer-based services and organizations
led by individuals with lived experience.
Sec. 5. APPROPRIATION; HUMAN SERVICES; JUSTICE-INVOLVED
INDIVIDUALS; HOUSING; SUBSTANCE USE AND MENTAL
HEALTH; RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT
(a) The sum of $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Agency of Human Services in fiscal year 2026 to issue grants expanding
access to residential recovery facilities for substance use disorders and mental
health conditions.
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 6 of 11
(b) Any grant issued pursuant to this section shall be used to provide
supportive and transitional housing to individuals who are at risk of
incarceration, being released from incarceration, or who were previously
incarcerated.
Sec. 6. APPROPRIATION; HUMAN SERVICES; JUSTICE-INVOLVED
INDIVIDUALS; SUBSTANCE USE; RECOVERY SUPPORT
SERVICES
(a) The sum of $250,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Human Services in fiscal year 2026 to issue grants to recovery
centers across the State.
(b) Any grant issued pursuant to this section shall be used to provide
recovery support services to those who are incarcerated or who were
previously incarcerated.
Sec. 7. APPROPRIATION; ATTORNEY GENERAL; JUSTICE-
INVOLVED INDIVIDUALS; COMMUNITY JUSTICE CENTERS;
RESTORATIVE APPROACHES COLLABORATIVE
(a) The sum of $250,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Human Services in fiscal year 2026 to issue grants to community
justice centers across the State and to the Restorative Approaches
Collaborative.
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 7 of 11
(b) Any grant issued pursuant to this section shall be used to provide
restorative justice programs to those who are at risk of being incarcerated, and
those currently incarcerated or detained.
Sec. 8. APPROPRIATION; HUMAN SERVICES; JUSTICE-INVOLVED
INDIVIDUALS; COMMUNITY SERVICES; DESIGNATED
AGENCIES
(a) The sum of $250,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Human Services in fiscal year 2026 to issue grants to designated
agencies for pilot programs in supportive and transitional housing.
(b) Any grants issued pursuant to this section shall be used to provide
community-based services to those who are detained, incarcerated, and who
have been previously incarcerated. Designated agencies shall use any grants
issued to support justice-involved individuals in maintaining housing and
recovery.
Sec. 9. APPROPRIATION; HUMAN SERVICES; JUSTICE-INVOLVED
INDIVIDUALS; SUBSTANCE USE AND MENTAL HEALTH;
OUTPATIENT SERVICES; PILOT PROGRAM
(a) The sum of $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Human Services in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of establishing a
pilot program to provide community-based outpatient mental health and
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 8 of 11
substance use disorder services to detained or incarcerated individuals and
individuals reentering the community.
(1) Within correctional settings, a sufficient portion of any monies
appropriated shall be used to:
(A) reimburse community-based mental health and substance use
disorder treatment providers who serve detainees and incarcerated individuals
through telehealth or in-person visits at a correctional facility; and
(B) employ or contract with a case manager from a designated
agency who works both on-site and remotely across the continuum of care to
schedule mental health and substance use disorder treatment for detainees and
incarcerated individuals that:
(i) ensures privacy during telehealth or in-person appointments;
(ii) establishes a relationship with case manager in the community
prior to the detainee or incarcerated individual reentering the community; and
(iii) assists individuals reentering the community in applying for
Medicaid or procuring alternative health coverage.
(2) Within six months after an individual’s release from detention or
incarceration, a sufficient portion of any monies appropriated shall be used to:
(A) reimburse community-based mental health and substance use
disorder treatment providers who provide telehealth or in-person visits prior to
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 9 of 11
the individual’s Medicaid or other health coverage taking effect or in the event
that the individual does not have health care coverage; and
(B) employ or contract with a community-based case manager to
schedule treatment for individuals; coordinate transportation or information
technology connections for treatment; and provide continued assistance in
applying for Medicaid or procuring alternative health coverage.
(b)(1) In accordance with this section, community-based mental health and
substance use providers serving detained, incarcerated individuals, or
individuals reentering the community after incarceration shall submit
reimbursement forms to the case manager in the correctional facility or in the
community, as appropriate, using standard Medicaid billing codes. The case
manager shall remit the reimbursement form to the correct payer.
(2) The Agency of Human Services may support the operation and
administration of the pilot program described in this section through grants of
financial assistance to, or contracts for services with, a third-party that meets
the Agency’s requirements.
(3) Any monies appropriated pursuant to this section shall not be used to
support the pilot program through the Department of Corrections’ third-party
provider of health care services at Vermont’s correctional facilities.
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 10 of 11
Sec. 10. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES; MORATORIUM;
RESERVATION OF FUNDS; HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
SERVICES
(a) The Department of Corrections and the Department of Buildings and
General Services shall cease construction of new correctional facilities and
cease any expansion or renovations of existing correctional facilities until July
1, 2029.
(b) Any appropriations designated for construction, expansion, or
renovation of correctional facilities shall be reallocated by the Joint Legislative
Justice Oversight Committee to support transitional and supportive housing
initiatives, community-based mental health and substance use services, and
workforce development for justice-involved individuals.
(c) Annually, on or before July 1, the Agency of Human Services, in
collaboration with the Office of the Attorney General and other relevant
stakeholders, shall submit a written report to the Joint Legislative Justice
Oversight Committee detailing a plan to:
(1) monitor reinvestment efforts pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section;
(2) calculate any cost savings through the moratorium on correctional
facility construction in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and
reinvestment efforts pursuant to subsection (b) of this section; and
VT LEG #381116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.456
2025 Page 11 of 11
(3) analyze the efforts contained in this section and provide any
proposed legislation to reinvest in the community continuum of care.
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381116 v.1